test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nehiyawe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nêhiyawêw - help : # Ordinary VAI verb - full paradigm

     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nêhiyawê
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nêhiyawêk
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nêhiyawêtân
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkan
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: nêhiyawêhkêk
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: nêhiyawêhkahk
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nêhiyawêw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nêhiyawêyiwa
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninêhiyawânân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinêhiyawânaw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinêhiyawânâwâw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nêhiyawêwak
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: nêhiyawâyiwa
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Sg: nikî-nêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Sg: kikî-nêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kî-nêhiyawêw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3oSg: kî-nêhiyawêyiwa
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Pl: nikî-nêhiyawânân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+12Pl: kikî-nêhiyawânaw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Pl: kikî-nêhiyawânâwâw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Pl: kî-nêhiyawêwak
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3oPl: kî-nêhiyawêyiwa
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: nika-nêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: kika-nêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: ka-nêhiyawêw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+3oSg: ka-nêhiyawêyiwa
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: nika-nêhiyawânân
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: kika-nêhiyawânaw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: kika-nêhiyawânâwâw
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: ka-nêhiyawêwak
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Def+3oPl: ka-nêhiyawêyiwa
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3oPl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Ind+Fut+Int+3oPl+?
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+?
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oPl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oPl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Sg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3oSg+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+12Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Cnj+Prt+3Pl+?
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nêhiyawêyâni
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+2Sg: nêhiyawêyani
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nêhiyawêci
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+3oSg: nêhiyawêyici
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nêhiyawêyâhki
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+12Pl: nêhiyawêyahko
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nêhiyawêyêko
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nêhiyawêtwâwi
     nêhiyawêw+V+IA+Fut+Cond+3oPl: nêhiyawêyici
